Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-428
Partner's transferable interest in partnership.

The only transferable interest of a partner in the partnership is the partner's share of the profits and losses of the partnership and the partner's right to receive distributions. The interest is personal property.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 28.